California, session 20252026, AB1715.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1.Section 311.8 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:311.8.The commission shall, on or before June 1, 2028, establish and make available on its internet website a searchable database of public utility advice letters with, at a minimum, all of the following features:(a)A common indexing scheme across utilities.(b)The ability to search by advice letter title, advice letter number, date filed, date approved, associated docket numbers, and keywords.(c)Data, including, at a minimum, every advice letter filed since at least January 1, 2020, with links to all public responses, protests, and resolutions, submitted since at least January 1, 2020.SEC. 2.SECTION 1. Section 593 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:593. (a) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:(1) “Taxpayer funding” means any funds received from public entities in the form of grants, loans, or bonds that were appropriated by the Congress of the United States and provided under the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (Public Law 117-58), the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169), or the CHIPS Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-167), or any future similar funding program established by the federal government, or the state, to provide loans and grants to a utility.(2) “Utility” means an electrical corporation or gas corporation.(b) (1) Unless unchanged from the previous report, each utility shall include all of the following information in each quarterly report required by commission Resolution E-5254 (April 6, 2023) for any taxpayer funding greater than or equal to one million dollars ($1,000,000) that the utility has applied for, or received, since the previous quarterly report:(A) The name of the grant, loan, or bond funding source.(B) The dollar amount applied for or received.(C) A spending plan that includes all of the following:(i) The project, element of operations, or other expenses for which these funds will be used.(ii) A description of each item identified in clause (i), including project timelines.(iii) Whether each item identified in clause (i) is new or existing.(iv) Whether the funds used for each item identified in clause (i) are offsetting existing costs or are new costs.(D) The status of the application, whether it is approved, denied, or pending, and all of the following, as applicable:(i) If the application is pending, the expected date of decision.(ii) If the application is approved, the date awarded, a copy of the grant agreement, if applicable, the dollar amount awarded, and the duration of the grant or loan in months or years.(iii) If the application is denied, the date that decision was announced.(E) A list of all applications planned or pending at the commission for which ratepayer funds are being sought for projects funded, in whole or in part, by taxpayer funding.(F) Only for taxpayer funding received, a calculation of all measurable value to, or savings expected to benefit, ratepayers from receipt of the taxpayer funding, including, but not limited to, estimates of all of the following, in a form and manner to be prescribed by the commission:(i) Decreases in forecasts of expenses, capital, interest, and taxes.(ii) Changes in revenue requirements.(iii) Changes in average customer bills.(2) If the commission determines that a utility is not in compliance with the quarterly reporting requirement of paragraph (1), the commission shall exercise its authority to require compliance by the utility and may pursue an enforcement action against the utility for noncompliance.(3) The utility shall ensure that the quarterly report complies with any information disclosure requirements of each funding source and pursuant to federal law.(c) (1) In each application in which a utility is seeking ratepayer funding, the commission shall require the utility to report all relevant taxpayer funding greater than or equal to one million dollars ($1,000,000) that the utility is pursuing or has secured.(2) If the commission determines that a utility did not comply with paragraph (1), the commission may impose a penalty against the utility.(d) (1) Notwithstanding Section 728, the commission shall require a utility to deliver to ratepayers the financial benefits of taxpayer funding received, as calculated in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), including the cost savings for activities previously approved by the commission.(2) The commission may satisfy the requirement of paragraph (1) by requiring a utility to adjust the utility’s revenue requirements and rate applications to account for ratepayer savings.(e) This section does not assume or imply that an application for, or receipt of, taxpayer funding for an activity results in a presumption or determination of the reasonableness of using ratepayer funding for that activity.(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3.SEC. 2. Section 913.7 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:913.7. (a) (1) On or before January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the commission shall provide a report to the Legislature with a summary of the information on taxpayer funding reported by each utility pursuant to Section 593, including the number of grants or loans, the source of those grants or loans, the total dollar amount received, the projects funded by the grants or loans, and the total demonstrated ratepayer savings.(2) The commission may integrate the report required by paragraph (1) into any other report the commission is required to annually provide to the Legislature.(3) (A) The initial report shall summarize taxpayer funding received beginning with the first quarterly report required by commission Resolution E-5254 (April 6, 2023) and encompass all additional funds received through 2026.(B) Each subsequent report shall summarize the taxpayer funds received by each utility during the previous year.(b) The commission shall ensure that the annual report complies with any information disclosure requirements of each funding source and pursuant to federal law.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.